Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 81. Duties of Adjutant General Regarding Veterans

§§ 1481,
1482.
Repealed.
1959, No. 329 (Adj. Sess.), § 59, eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 1483.
Adjutant General; duties as to veterans’ affairs.

In addition to the duties elsewhere set forth by law, the Adjutant and Inspector General shall:

acquaint himself or herself, and his or her assistants and employees, with federal, State, and local laws enacted for the benefit of members of the U.S. Armed Forces and Vermont National Guard, veterans having a discharge other than dishonorable, and the heirs and beneficiaries of members and veterans;

collect data and information as to facilities and services available to members of the U.S. Armed Forces and Vermont National Guard, veterans, and the heirs and beneficiaries of members and veterans;

cooperate with information or service agencies throughout the State, to inform members of the U.S. Armed Forces and Vermont National Guard, veterans, the heirs or beneficiaries of members and veterans, and military and civilian authorities, regarding the existence or availability of:

educational training and retraining facilities;

health, medical, rehabilitation, and housing services and facilities;

employment and reemployment services; and

provisions of federal, State, and local laws affording rights, privileges, and benefits to members of the U.S. Armed Forces and Vermont National Guard, and veterans and their families and dependents, and other matters of similar, related, or appropriate nature;

assist veterans and their heirs or beneficiaries in the presentation, proof, and establishment of claims, privileges, rights, and other benefits under federal, State, or local laws; and

cooperate with all national, State, and local governmental and private agencies in securing services or any benefits to veterans and their families and dependents.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 35(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

2021, No. 10

, § 68.

§ 1484.
Assistants; office space.

Subject to the approval of the Governor, the Adjutant and Inspector General may employ expert and clerical assistants as necessary to administer the functions and duties of the Adjutant and Inspector General with respect to veterans’ affairs, and shall fix their compensation within the amounts made available by appropriation for those functions and duties.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 35(c), eff. March 1, 1961;

2005, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2021, No. 10

, § 69.

§ 1485.
Cooperation with local organizations.

The Adjutant and Inspector General may cooperate with local organizations in the State to provide information and assistance for the purposes set forth in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 35(d), eff. March 1, 1961;

2021, No. 10

, § 70.

§ 1486.
Acceptance of gifts, services, and facilities.

The Adjutant and Inspector General is authorized to accept gifts, services, and facilities from any source, public or private, granted in aid of the administration of the duties of the Adjutant and Inspector General, provided that no obligation is imposed by the acceptance.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 35(e), eff. March 1, 1961;

2021, No. 10

, § 71.

§ 1487.
Repealed. 2009, No. 33, § 83(i)(3).